Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB313.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302(10)(i.1) and (i.2) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1302. Vehicles exempt from registration.The following types of vehicles are exempt from registration:* * *(10) Any farm vehicle used exclusively upon a farm or farms owned or operated by the owner of the vehicle, subject to the following:(i.1) Type A--Such a farm vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not exceeding 10,000 pounds may be driven upon highways [only from sunrise to sunset and] between:(A) Parts of one such farm.123456789101112131415161718 (B) Such farms located not more than 50 miles apart.(C) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of 50 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of buying or selling agricultural commodities or supplies.(D) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of 50 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of repairing or servicing of the farm vehicle or the trailer or semitrailer being towed or hauled by the farm vehicle.(i.2) Type B--Such a farm vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of greater than 10,000 pounds and not exceeding 17,000 pounds may be driven upon highways [only from sunrise to sunset and] between:(A) Parts of one such farm.(B) Such farms located not more than 25 miles apart.(C) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of 25 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of buying or selling agricultural commodities or supplies.(D) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of 50 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of repairing or servicing of the farm vehicle or the trailer or semitrailer being towed or hauled by the farm vehicle.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0313PN0266 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829